Utah statutes.
62A-4a-110.   Receipt of gifts -- Volunteer services.

(1)  The division may receive gifts, grants, devises, and donations.  These gifts, grants, devises, donations, or their proceeds shall be credited to the program which the donor designates and may be used for the purposes requested by the donor, if the request conforms to state and federal policy.  If a donor makes no specific request, the division may use the gift, grant, devise, or donation for the best interest of the division.

(2)  The division may:

(a)  accept and use volunteer labor or services of applicants, recipients, and other members of the community.  The division may reimburse volunteers for necessary expenses, including transportation, and provide recognition awards and recognition meals for services rendered.  The division may cooperate with volunteer organizations in collecting funds to be used in the volunteer program.  Those donated funds shall be considered as private, nonlapsing funds until used by the division, and may be invested under guidelines established by the state treasurer;

(b)  encourage merchants and providers of services to donate goods and services or to provide them at a nominal price or below cost;

(c)  distribute goods to applicants or consumers free or for a nominal charge and tax free; and

(d)  appeal to the public for funds to meet applicants' and consumers' needs which are not otherwise provided for by law.  Those appeals may include Sub-for-Santa Programs, recreational programs for minors, and requests for household appliances and home repairs, under rules established by the division.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

